Washington statutes.
RCW 39.110.050

Operating procedures.

(1) An authority established pursuant to this chapter must adopt general operating procedures for the authority. The authority must also adopt operating procedures for individual programs as they are developed for obtaining funds and for providing funds to borrowers. These operating procedures must be adopted by resolution prior to the authority operating the applicable programs.

(2) The operating procedures must include, but are not limited to:

(a) Appropriate standards for securing loans and other financing the authority provides to borrowers, such as guarantees or collateral; and

(b) Strict standards for providing financing to borrowers, such as:

(i) The borrower is a responsible party with a high probability of being able to repay the financing provided by the authority;

(ii) The financing is reasonably expected to benefit the creating municipality by enabling a borrower to increase or maintain jobs or capital in the municipality;

(iii) The borrowers with the greatest needs or that provide the most public benefit are given higher priority by the authority; and

(iv) The financing is consistent with any plan adopted by the authority under the provisions of RCW 39.110.060.

[ 2012 c 193 s 6.]